Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.03, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Prohibited practices. An employer may not, directly or indirectly and with intent to defraud: (1) cause any employee to give a receipt for wages for a greater amount than that actually paid to the employee for services rendered; (2) directly or indirectly demand or receive from any employee any rebate or refund from the wages owed the employee under contract of employment with the employer; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (3) in any manner make or attempt to make it appear that the wages paid to any employee were greater than the amount actually paid to the employeedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (4) if an employer has a formal job classification and compensation plan, place an employee in a job classification or job category or provide a job title that misrepresents the employee's experience or actual job duties and responsibilities. new text end